Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 27.1 Plastic Recycling and Litter Act

21-27.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as “The Plastic Recycling and Litter Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 598, § 1.

21-27.1-2.
Products produced with chlorofluorocarbons prohibited.

No disposable prepared food service products shall be purchased or sold in this state if they have been produced with chlorofluorocarbons.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 598, § 1.

21-27.1-3.
Plastic recycling and litter commission.

There is created a permanent commission consisting of thirteen (13) members: one of whom shall be the director of the department of environmental management or his or her designee, who shall act as chairperson of the commission; one of whom shall be the director of the solid waste management corporation or his or her designee; one of whom shall be the chairperson of the source reduction task force or his or her designee; one of whom shall be a state senator appointed by the president of the senate; one of whom shall be a state representative appointed by the speaker; one of whom shall be a representative of the plastic packaging industry, appointed by the governor; one of whom shall be a distributor of plastic/foam food service products, appointed by the lieutenant governor; one of whom shall be a retailer who sells plastic/foam food service products, appointed by the president of the senate; one of whom shall be a fast food service representative or owner, appointed by the speaker; one of whom shall be a representative of a hospital or hospital organization, appointed by the governor; two (2) of whom shall be representatives of environmental groups involved with litter issues; one of whom shall be appointed by the lieutenant governor and the other appointed by the president of the senate; one of whom shall be a representative from an educational institution food service, appointed by the speaker.

The purpose of the commission shall be to produce a plan which will provide for the maximum recycling of plastic and foam food service products. For those products which cannot be recycled, the commission will develop guidelines for the use of photodegradable and biodegradable products wherever feasible.

The commission shall monitor the plan and guidelines and study and update its findings and recommendations on a continuing basis.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 98; P.L. 1990, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 21; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 53.